test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-subst-2tav-ae_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst

Tests:
  Noun - hellá:
    hellá+N+Sg+Nom:  hellá
    hellá+N+Sg+Gen:  helá
    hellá+N+Sg+Gen:  helá
    hellá+N+Sg+Ill:  heelán
    hellá+N+Sg+Loc:  helláást
    hellá+N+Sg+Com:  helláin
    hellá+N+Sg+Abe:  heláttáá
    hellá+N+Ess:  hellán
    hellá+N+Par:  hellád
    hellá+N+Pl+Nom:  heláh
    hellá+N+Pl+Gen:  helái
    hellá+N+Pl+Acc:  helláid
    hellá+N+Pl+Ill:  helláid
    hellá+N+Pl+Loc:  heláin
    hellá+N+Pl+Com:  heláiguin
    hellá+N+Pl+Abe:  heláittáá

  Noun - pyerá:
    pyerá+N+Sg+Nom:  pyerá
    pyerá+N+Sg+Gen:  pyerá
    pyerá+N+Sg+Acc:  pyerá
    pyerá+N+Sg+Ill:  pyerán
    pyerá+N+Sg+Loc: [pyerást, pyeráást]
    pyerá+N+Sg+Com:  pyeráin
    pyerá+N+Sg+Abe:  pyeráttáá
    pyerá+N+Ess:  pyerán
    pyerá+N+Par:  pyerán
    pyerá+N+Pl+Nom:  pyeráh
    pyerá+N+Pl+Gen:  pyerái
    pyerá+N+Pl+Acc:  pyeráid
    pyerá+N+Pl+Ill:  pyeráid
    pyerá+N+Pl+Loc:  pyeráin
    pyerá+N+Pl+Com:  pyeráiguin
    pyerá+N+Pl+Abe:  pyeráittáá

  Noun - pijgá:
    pijgá+N+Sg+Nom:  pijgá
    pijgá+N+Sg+Gen:  piijgá
    pijgá+N+Sg+Acc:  piijgá
    pijgá+N+Sg+Ill:  piijgán
    pijgá+N+Sg+Loc:  [piijgást, pijgáást]
    pijgá+N+Sg+Com:  pijgáin
    pijgá+N+Sg+Abe:  pijgáttáá
    pijgá+N+Ess:  pijgán
    pijgá+N+Par:	pijgád
    pijgá+N+Pl+Nom:  piijgáh
    pijgá+N+Pl+Gen: [piijgái, pijgái]
    pijgá+N+Pl+Acc:  piijgáid
    pijgá+N+Pl+Ill:  pijgáid
    pijgá+N+Pl+Loc:  piijgáin
    pijgá+N+Pl+Com:  pijgáiguin
    pijgá+N+Pl+Abe:  pijgáittáá

  Noun - stiváh:
    stiváh+N+Pl+Nom:  stiváh
    stiváh+N+Pl+Gen:  stivái
    stiváh+N+Pl+Acc:  stiváid
    stiváh+N+Pl+Ill:  stiváid
    stiváh+N+Pl+Loc:  stiváin
    stiváh+N+Pl+Com:  stiváiguin
    stiváh+N+Pl+Abe:  stiváittáá

  Noun - liljá:
    liljá+N+Sg+Nom:  liljá
    liljá+N+Sg+Gen:  liljá
    liljá+N+Sg+Acc:  liljá
    liljá+N+Sg+Ill:  liilján
    liljá+N+Sg+Loc:  liljáást
    liljá+N+Sg+Com:  liljáin
    liljá+N+Sg+Abe:  liljáttáá
    liljá+N+Ess:  lilján
    liljá+N+Par:	liljád
    liljá+N+Pl+Nom:  liljáh
    liljá+N+Pl+Gen:  [liiljái, liljái]
    liljá+N+Pl+Acc: liiljáid
    liljá+N+Pl+Ill:  liljáid
    liljá+N+Pl+Loc: [liiljáin, liljáin]
    liljá+N+Pl+Com:  liljáiguin
    liljá+N+Pl+Abe:  liljáittáá

  Noun - tiljá:
    tiljá+N+Sg+Nom:  tiljá
    tiljá+N+Sg+Gen:  tiljá
    tiljá+N+Sg+Acc:  tiljá
    tiljá+N+Sg+Ill:  tiilján
    tiljá+N+Sg+Loc:  tiljáást
    tiljá+N+Sg+Com:  tiljáin
    tiljá+N+Sg+Abe:  tiljáttáá
    tiljá+N+Ess:  	tilján
    tiljá+N+Par:	tiljád
    tiljá+N+Pl+Nom:  tiljáh
    tiljá+N+Pl+Gen:  tiljái
    tiljá+N+Pl+Acc:  tiljáid
    tiljá+N+Pl+Ill:  tiljáid
    tiljá+N+Pl+Loc:  tiljáin
    tiljá+N+Pl+Com:  tiljáiguin
    tiljá+N+Pl+Abe:  tiljáittáá

  Noun - linjá:
    linjá+N+Sg+Nom:  linjá
    linjá+N+Sg+Gen:  linjá
    linjá+N+Sg+Gen:  linjá
    linjá+N+Sg+Ill:  liinján
    linjá+N+Sg+Loc:  linjáást
    linjá+N+Sg+Com:  linjáin
    linjá+N+Sg+Abe:  linjáttáá
    linjá+N+Ess:  linján
    linjá+N+Par:  linjád
    linjá+N+Pl+Nom:  linjáh
    linjá+N+Pl+Gen:  linjái
    linjá+N+Pl+Acc:  linjáid
    linjá+N+Pl+Ill:  linjáid
    linjá+N+Pl+Loc:  linjáin
    linjá+N+Pl+Com:  linjáiguin
    linjá+N+Pl+Abe:  linjáittáá

  Noun - tikká:
    tikká+N+Sg+Nom:  tikká
    tikká+N+Sg+Gen:  tiká
    tikká+N+Sg+Acc:  tiká
    tikká+N+Sg+Ill:  tiikán
    tikká+N+Sg+Loc:  tikkáást
    tikká+N+Sg+Com:  tikkáin
    tikká+N+Sg+Abe:  tikáttáá
    tikká+N+Ess:  tikkán
    tikká+N+Par:  tikkád
    tikká+N+Pl+Nom:  tikáh
    tikká+N+Pl+Gen:  tikái
    tikká+N+Pl+Acc:  tikkáid
    tikká+N+Pl+Ill:  tikkáid
    tikká+N+Pl+Loc:  tikáin
    tikká+N+Pl+Com:  tikáiguin
    tikká+N+Pl+Abe:  tikáittáá

  Noun - sivlá:
    sivlá+N+Sg+Nom:  sivlá
    sivlá+N+Sg+Gen:  sivlá
    sivlá+N+Sg+Acc: sivlá
    sivlá+N+Sg+Ill:  siivlán
    sivlá+N+Sg+Loc:  sivláást
    sivlá+N+Sg+Com:  sivláin
    sivlá+N+Sg+Abe:  sivláttáá
    sivlá+N+Ess:  sivlán
    sivlá+N+Par:  sivlád
    sivlá+N+Pl+Nom:  sivláh
    sivlá+N+Pl+Gen: [siivlái, sivlái]
    sivlá+N+Pl+Acc:  sivláid
    sivlá+N+Pl+Ill:  sivláid
    sivlá+N+Pl+Loc:  sivláin
    sivlá+N+Pl+Com:  sivláiguin
    sivlá+N+Pl+Abe:  sivláittáá

  Noun - lijmá:
    lijmá+N+Sg+Nom:  lijmá
    lijmá+N+Sg+Gen:  liijmá
    lijmá+N+Sg+Acc:  liijmá
    lijmá+N+Sg+Ill:  liijmán
    lijmá+N+Sg+Loc:  lijmáást
    lijmá+N+Sg+Com:  lijmáin
    lijmá+N+Sg+Abe:  lijmáttáá
    lijmá+N+Ess:  lijmán
    lijmá+N+Par:  lijmád
    lijmá+N+Pl+Nom:  liijmáh
    lijmá+N+Pl+Gen: [liijmái, lijmái]
    lijmá+N+Pl+Acc:  liijmáid
    lijmá+N+Pl+Ill:  [lijmáid, liijmáid]
    lijmá+N+Pl+Loc:  liijmáin
    lijmá+N+Pl+Com:  lijmáiguin
    lijmá+N+Pl+Abe:  lijmáittáá

  Noun - sijmá:
    sijmá+N+Sg+Nom:  sijmá
    sijmá+N+Sg+Gen:  siijmá
    sijmá+N+Sg+Acc:  siijmá
    sijmá+N+Sg+Ill:  siijmán
    sijmá+N+Sg+Loc:  sijmáást
    sijmá+N+Sg+Com:  sijmáin
    sijmá+N+Sg+Abe:  sijmáttáá
    sijmá+N+Ess:  sijmán
    sijmá+N+Par:  sijmád
    sijmá+N+Pl+Nom: siijmáh
    sijmá+N+Pl+Gen: [siijmái, sijmái]
    sijmá+N+Pl+Acc:  siijmáid
    sijmá+N+Pl+Ill:  [siijmáid, sijmáid]
    sijmá+N+Pl+Loc:  siijmáin
    sijmá+N+Pl+Com:  sijmáiguin
    sijmá+N+Pl+Abe:  sijmáittáá

  Noun - ripá:
    ripá+N+Sg+Nom:  ripá
    ripá+N+Sg+Gen:  rivá
    ripá+N+Sg+Acc:  rivá
    ripá+N+Sg+Ill:  ripán
    ripá+N+Sg+Loc:  riiváást
    ripá+N+Sg+Com:  riváin
    ripá+N+Sg+Abe:  riváttáá
    ripá+N+Ess:  rippáán
    ripá+N+Par: rippáád
    ripá+N+Pl+Nom:  riváh
    ripá+N+Pl+Gen:  rivái
    ripá+N+Pl+Acc:  riváid
    ripá+N+Pl+Ill:  riváid
    ripá+N+Pl+Loc:  riváin
    ripá+N+Pl+Com:  riváiguin
    ripá+N+Pl+Abe:  riváittáá

  Noun - cirrá:
    cirrá+N+Sg+Nom:  cirrá
    cirrá+N+Sg+Gen:  cirá
    cirrá+N+Sg+Acc:  cirá
    cirrá+N+Sg+Ill:  ciirán
    cirrá+N+Sg+Loc:  cirráást
    cirrá+N+Sg+Com:  cirráin
    cirrá+N+Sg+Abe:  ciráttáá
    cirrá+N+Ess:  cirrán
    cirrá+N+Par: cirrád
    cirrá+N+Pl+Nom:  ciráh
    cirrá+N+Pl+Gen:  cirái
    cirrá+N+Pl+Acc:  cirráid
    cirrá+N+Pl+Ill:  cirráid
    cirrá+N+Pl+Loc:  cirráin
    cirrá+N+Pl+Com:  ciráguin
    cirrá+N+Pl+Abe:  ciráittáá

  Noun - kissá:
    kissá+N+Sg+Nom:  kissá
    kissá+N+Sg+Gen:  kisá
    kissá+N+Sg+Acc:  kisá
    kissá+N+Sg+Ill:  kiisán
    kissá+N+Sg+Loc:  kissáást
    kissá+N+Sg+Com:  kissáin
    kissá+N+Sg+Abe:  kisáttáá
    kissá+N+Ess:  kissán
    kissá+N+Par: kissád
    kissá+N+Pl+Nom:  kisáh
    kissá+N+Pl+Gen:  kisái
    kissá+N+Pl+Acc:  [kissáid, kisáid]
    kissá+N+Pl+Ill:  kissáid
    kissá+N+Pl+Loc:  kisáin
    kissá+N+Pl+Com:  kisáiguin
    kissá+N+Pl+Abe:  kisáittáá

  Noun - pittá:
    pittá+N+Sg+Nom:  pittá
    pittá+N+Sg+Gen:  pitá
    pittá+N+Sg+Acc:  pitá
    pittá+N+Sg+Ill:  piitán
    pittá+N+Sg+Loc:  pittáást
    pittá+N+Sg+Com:  pittáin
    pittá+N+Sg+Abe:  pitáttáá
    pittá+N+Ess:  pittán
    pittá+N+Par: pittád
    pittá+N+Pl+Nom:  pitáh
    pittá+N+Pl+Gen:  pitái
    pittá+N+Pl+Acc:  pittáid
    pittá+N+Pl+Ill:  pittáid
    pittá+N+Pl+Loc:  pitáin
    pittá+N+Pl+Com:  pitáiguin
    pittá+N+Pl+Abe:  pitáittáá

  Noun - hijvá:
    hijvá+N+Sg+Nom:  hijvá
    hijvá+N+Sg+Gen:  hiijvá
    hijvá+N+Sg+Acc:  hiijvá
    hijvá+N+Sg+Ill:  hiijván
    hijvá+N+Sg+Loc:  hijváást
    hijvá+N+Sg+Com:  hijváin
    hijvá+N+Sg+Abe:  hijváttáá
    hijvá+N+Ess:  hijván
    hijvá+N+Par:  hijvád
    hijvá+N+Pl+Nom:  hiijváh
    hijvá+N+Pl+Gen:  [hiijvái, hijvái]
    hijvá+N+Pl+Acc:  hiijváid
    hijvá+N+Pl+Ill:  [hiijváid, hijváid]
    hijvá+N+Pl+Loc:  hijváin
    hijvá+N+Pl+Com:  hijváiguin
    hijvá+N+Pl+Abe:  hijváittáá

  Noun - liššá:
    liššá+N+Sg+Nom:  liššá
    liššá+N+Sg+Gen:  lišá
    liššá+N+Sg+Acc:  lišá
    liššá+N+Sg+Ill:  liišán
    liššá+N+Sg+Loc:  liššáást
    liššá+N+Sg+Com:  liššáin
    liššá+N+Sg+Abe:  lišáttáá
    liššá+N+Ess:  liššán
    liššá+N+Par:  liššád
    liššá+N+Pl+Nom:  lišáh
    liššá+N+Pl+Gen:  lišái
    liššá+N+Pl+Acc:  liššáid
    liššá+N+Pl+Ill:  liššáid
    liššá+N+Pl+Loc:  lišáin
    liššá+N+Pl+Com:  lišáiguin
    liššá+N+Pl+Abe:  lišáittáá

  Noun - káigá:
    káigá+N+Sg+Nom:  káigá
    káigá+N+Sg+Gen: kááigá 
    káigá+N+Sg+Acc: kááigá
    káigá+N+Sg+Ill:  kááigán
    káigá+N+Sg+Loc:  káigáást
    káigá+N+Sg+Com:  káigáin
    káigá+N+Sg+Abe:  káigáttáá
    káigá+N+Ess:  káigán
    káigá+N+Par: káigád
    káigá+N+Pl+Nom:  kááigáh
    káigá+N+Pl+Gen:  [kááigái, káigái]
    káigá+N+Pl+Acc:  kááigáid
    káigá+N+Pl+Ill:  káigáid
    káigá+N+Pl+Loc:  kááigáin
    káigá+N+Pl+Com:  káigáiguin
    káigá+N+Pl+Abe:  káigáittáá

  Noun - vuáisá:
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Nom:  vuáisá
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Gen:  vuáisá
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Acc:  vuáisá
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Ill:  vuáisán
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Loc:  vuáisást
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Com:  vuáisáin
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Abe:  vuáisáttáá
    vuáisá+N+Ess:  vuáisán
    vuáisá+N+Par:  vuáisád
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Nom:  vuáisáh
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Gen: vuáisái
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Acc:  vuáisáid
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Ill:  vuáisáid
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Loc:  vuáisáin
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Com:  vuáisáiguin
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Abe:  vuáisáittáá

  Noun - nollá:
    nollá+N+Sg+Nom:  nollá
    nollá+N+Sg+Gen:  nolá
    nollá+N+Sg+Acc:  nolá
    nollá+N+Sg+Ill:  noolán
    nollá+N+Sg+Loc:  nolláást
    nollá+N+Sg+Com:  nolláin
    nollá+N+Sg+Abe:  noláttáá
    nollá+N+Ess:  nollán
    nollá+N+Par: nollád
    nollá+N+Pl+Nom:  noláh
    nollá+N+Pl+Gen:  nolái
    nollá+N+Pl+Acc:  nolláid
    nollá+N+Pl+Ill:  nolláid
    nollá+N+Pl+Loc:  [nolláin, noláin]
    nollá+N+Pl+Com:  noláiguin
    nollá+N+Pl+Abe:  noláittáá

  Noun - hommá:
    hommá+N+Sg+Nom:  hommá
    hommá+N+Sg+Gen:  homá
    hommá+N+Sg+Acc:  homá
    hommá+N+Sg+Ill:  hoomán
    hommá+N+Sg+Loc:  hommáást
    hommá+N+Sg+Com:  hommáin
    hommá+N+Sg+Abe:  homáttáá
    hommá+N+Ess:  hommán
    hommá+N+Par: hommád
    hommá+N+Pl+Nom:  homáh
    hommá+N+Pl+Gen:  [hommái, homái]
    hommá+N+Pl+Acc:  hommáid
    hommá+N+Pl+Ill:  hommáid
    hommá+N+Pl+Loc:  homáin
    hommá+N+Pl+Com:  homáiguin
    hommá+N+Pl+Abe:  homáittáá

  Noun - torppá:
    torppá+N+Sg+Nom:  torppá
    torppá+N+Sg+Gen:  torpá
    torppá+N+Sg+Acc:  torpá
    torppá+N+Sg+Ill:  toorpán
    torppá+N+Sg+Loc:  torppáást
    torppá+N+Sg+Com:  torppáin
    torppá+N+Sg+Abe:  torpáttáá
    torppá+N+Ess:  torppán
    torppá+N+Par: torppád
    torppá+N+Pl+Nom:  torpáh
    torppá+N+Pl+Gen:  torpái
    torppá+N+Pl+Acc:  torppáid
    torppá+N+Pl+Ill:  torppáid
    torppá+N+Pl+Loc:  torpáin
    torppá+N+Pl+Com:  torpáiguin
    torppá+N+Pl+Abe:  torpáittáá

  Noun - rottá:
    rottá+N+Sg+Nom:  rottá
    rottá+N+Sg+Gen:  rotá
    rottá+N+Sg+Acc:  rotá
    rottá+N+Sg+Ill:  rootán
    rottá+N+Sg+Loc:  rottáást
    rottá+N+Sg+Com:  rottáin
    rottá+N+Sg+Abe:  rotáttáá
    rottá+N+Ess:  rottán
    rottá+N+Par: rottád
    rottá+N+Pl+Nom:  rotáh
    rottá+N+Pl+Gen:  rotái
    rottá+N+Pl+Acc:  rottáid
    rottá+N+Pl+Ill:  rottáid
    rottá+N+Pl+Loc:  rotáin
    rottá+N+Pl+Com:  rotáiguin
    rottá+N+Pl+Abe:  rotáittáá

  Noun - sohvá:
    sohvá+N+Sg+Nom:  sohvá
    sohvá+N+Sg+Gen:  sohvá
    sohvá+N+Sg+Acc:  sohvá
    sohvá+N+Sg+Ill:  soohván
    sohvá+N+Sg+Loc:  sohváást
    sohvá+N+Sg+Com:  sohváin
    sohvá+N+Sg+Abe:  sohváttáá
    sohvá+N+Ess:  sohván
    sohvá+N+Par: sohvád
    sohvá+N+Pl+Nom:  sohváh
    sohvá+N+Pl+Gen:  sohvái
    sohvá+N+Pl+Acc:  sohváid
    sohvá+N+Pl+Ill:  sohváid
    sohvá+N+Pl+Loc:  sohváin
    sohvá+N+Pl+Com:  sohváiguin
    sohvá+N+Pl+Abe:  sohváittáá

  Noun - rovvá:
    rovvá+N+Sg+Nom:  rovvá
    rovvá+N+Sg+Gen:  rová
    rovvá+N+Sg+Acc:  rová
    rovvá+N+Sg+Ill:  roován
    rovvá+N+Sg+Loc:  rovváást
    rovvá+N+Sg+Com:  rovváin
    rovvá+N+Sg+Abe:  rováttáá
    rovvá+N+Ess:  rovván
    rovvá+N+Par: rovvád
    rovvá+N+Pl+Nom:  rováh
    rovvá+N+Pl+Gen:  rovái
    rovvá+N+Pl+Acc:  rovváid
    rovvá+N+Pl+Ill:  rovváid
    rovvá+N+Pl+Loc:  rovváin
    rovvá+N+Pl+Com:  rováiguin
    rovvá+N+Pl+Abe:  rováittáá
